District of Columbia statutes.
2-354.04

Sole source procurements.

(a)

A contract may be awarded through noncompetitive negotiations when there is only one source for the required good or service.

(b)

The CPO shall make a determination and findings justifying the sole source procurement.

(c)

Notice of intent to enter into a sole source contract shall be posted on the Internet at least 10 days prior to award. The notice shall include:

(1)

The determination and findings required by subsection (b) of this section;

(2)

A description of the item to be procured; and

(3)

The intended sole source contractor.

(d)

The contract shall be made available online within 7 days of the contract award.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 404, 58 DCR 1185
This section is referenced in § 2-354.01, § 2-355.02, and § 2-356.02.